Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
PART 6
OFFENSES, PENALTIES, REMOVAL,
SUSPENSION, AND ENFORCEMENT

11-109-601. Penalty for noncompliance with the law.

It is unlawful for any person to carry on or conduct in this state a trust company business, or to advertise or hold himself or herself out as being engaged in or doing a trust company business, or to use the word "trust" or words "trust company" in connection with a business unless such person has complied with the provisions of this article 109 or other laws of this state specifically authorizing a fiduciary or trust business. Any person who violates this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1193, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3153, § 132, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-119 as it existed prior to 2003.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a class 2 misdemeanor, see § 18-1.3-501.

11-109-602. Assessment of civil money penalties by banking board.

After notice and a hearing as provided in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and after making a determination that no other appropriate governmental agency has taken similar action against such person for the same act or practice, the banking board may assess against and collect a civil penalty from:
(1) (a) (I) After notice and a hearing as provided in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and after making a determination that no other appropriate governmental agency has taken similar action against such person for the same act or practice, the banking board may assess against and collect a civil penalty from:

Any person who has violated any final cease-and-desist order issued by the banking board pursuant to section 11-109-104 (1)(c); and

Any trust company that, or any executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of such trust company who, violates or knowingly permits any person to violate any of the provisions of this article or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article, or engages or participates in any unsafe or unsound practice in connection with a trust company. The civil money penalty shall not exceed one thousand dollars per day for each day such violation continues. This provision shall include, but not be limited to, the following violations: Making, or causing to be made, delinquent payment of assessments under this section; submitting, or causing to be submitted, delinquent reports, including but not limited to call reports; or knowingly submitting, or causing to be submitted, to the banking board any report or statement that contains materially false or misleading information.

The banking board may, at its option and upon waiver of the right to a public hearing by a respondent, close to the public any hearing concerning an assessment of a civil money penalty, an order of suspension or removal from office, an order to cease and desist from any unlawful or unsafe and unsound practices, or any other formal enforcement action by the banking board.

For the purposes of this section, a violation shall include, but is not limited to, any action, by any person alone or with another person, that causes, brings about, or results in the participation in, counseling of, or aiding or abetting of a violation.

Civil money penalties shall be assessed by written notice of assessment of a civil money penalty served upon the person to be assessed. The notice of assessment of a civil money penalty shall state the amount of the penalty, the period for payment, the legal authority for the assessment, and the matters of fact or law constituting the grounds for assessment. The notice of assessment of a civil money penalty shall constitute a final order for purposes of judicial review pursuant to section 24-4-106, C.R.S.

The banking board shall have authority to determine the amount of any civil money penalty assessed against any executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the affairs of a trust company, except as expressly limited by this article. In determining the amount of the civil money penalty to be assessed, the banking board shall consider the good faith of the person assessed, the gravity of the violation, any previous violations by the person assessed, the nature and extent of any past violations, and such other matters as the banking board may deem appropriate; except that the civil money penalty shall be not more than one thousand dollars per day for each day the person assessed remains in violation.

Civil money penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be due and payable and collected within thirty days after the notice of assessment of a civil money penalty is issued by the banking board; except that the banking board may, in its discretion, compromise, modify, or set aside any civil money penalty. Any civil money penalty collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the general fund.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1193, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-119.1 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-603. No indemnification or insurance against civil money penalties.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no trust company shall indemnify or insure any executive officer, director, employee, agent, or person participating in the conduct of affairs of such trust company against civil money penalties.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1194, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-119.2 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-604. Removal of director, officer, or other person.

The banking board may serve any executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of a trust company with a written notice of its intention to remove him or her from office whenever the banking board determines:

That any such person has committed any violation of this article, a rule of the banking board, or a cease-and-desist order of the banking board that has become final; has engaged or participated in any unsafe or unsound practice in connection with a trust company; or has committed or engaged in any act, omission, or practice that constitutes a breach of fiduciary duty to the trust company; and

That the trust company has suffered or probably will suffer substantial financial loss or other damage or that the interests of its customers could be seriously prejudiced by reason of such violation or practice or breach of fiduciary duty or offense; or

That such person has received financial gain by reason of such violation, practice, breach of fiduciary duty, or offense; or

That such violation is one involving personal dishonesty on the part of such person or one that demonstrates a willful or continuing disregard for the safety or soundness of the trust company.

Whenever the banking board determines that an executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of a trust company, by conduct or practice with respect to another trust company or business institution that results in substantial financial loss or other damage, has evidenced either personal dishonesty or a willful or continuing disregard for the trust company's safety and soundness, and, in addition, has evidenced unfitness to continue his or her relationship with the trust company, the banking board may serve upon the person a written notice of its intention to remove him or her from office or to prohibit such person's further participation in any manner in the conduct of the affairs of any Colorado state-chartered trust company or bank.

A notice of intention to remove a director, executive officer, or other person from office or to prohibit such person's participation in the conduct of the affairs of a trust company shall contain a statement of the facts constituting grounds for removal and shall fix a time and place at which a hearing shall be held thereon. Such hearing shall be fixed for a date not earlier than thirty days nor later than sixty days after the date of service of such notice, unless an earlier or a later date is set by the banking board at the request of such director or executive officer or other person, and for good cause shown. Unless such director, executive officer, or other person appears at the hearing in person or by a duly authorized representative, he or she shall be deemed to have consented to the issuance of an order of removal or prohibition as specified in the notice issued pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of this section. In the event of such consent or, if, upon the record made at any such hearing, the banking board finds that any of the grounds specified in such notice have been established, the banking board may issue such orders of suspension or removal from office as it may deem appropriate. Any such order shall become effective at the expiration of thirty days after service upon such trust company and the director, executive officer, or other person concerned except in the case of an order issued upon consent, which shall become effective at the time specified therein. Such order shall remain effective and enforceable except to such extent as it is stayed, modified, terminated, or set aside by action of the banking board or a reviewing court.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1194, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(2) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1483, § 52, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-119.3 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-605. Suspension of director, officer, or other person.

The banking board may suspend an executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of a trust company who becomes ineligible to hold his or her position, or who after receipt of an order of the banking board to cease and desist violates this article or a lawful rule or order issued thereunder, or who is dishonest, or who is reckless or grossly incompetent in the conduct of trust business, or who may be subject to removal under section 11-109-604. It shall be a criminal offense for any such person, after receipt of a suspension order, to perform any duty or exercise any power of any trust company until the banking board vacates such suspension order. A suspension order shall specify the grounds thereof. A copy of the order shall be sent to the trust company concerned and to each member of its board of directors.

Ten days' notice, by certified mail, return receipt requested, and hearing shall be provided to any trust company affected by an action of the banking board in advance of any action taken by the banking board pursuant to this section. In cases found by the banking board to involve extraordinary circumstances requiring immediate action, the banking board may take such action, without notice or hearing, but shall promptly afford a subsequent hearing, upon application to rescind the action taken.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1196, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-119.4 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-606. Informal enforcement authority.

The banking board, or the commissioner if so authorized by the banking board, shall have authority to initiate informal actions to enforce the provisions of this article. In this regard the banking board or the commissioner may, in its or the commissioner's discretion, enter into written agreements such as a memorandum of understanding with, or an informal commitment letter from, or a strongly worded letter of reprimand to any trust company or any executive officer, director, employee, agent, or other person participating in the conduct of the affairs of the trust company.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1196, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-119.5 as it existed prior to 2003.

11-109-607. Receipt of deposits while insolvent.

It is a criminal offense if a trust company receives any deposit while insolvent, or an officer, director, or employee knows or, in the proper performance of his or her duty should know, of such insolvency and receives or authorizes the receipt of such deposit, and if such trust company or person has knowingly concealed or misstated material facts regarding the insolvency of the trust company from or to the banking board, commissioner, or division of banking.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1196, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 11-23-119.6 as it existed prior to 2003.